Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.140

Pension payments monthly—Surplus to general fund.

Payments provided for in this chapter shall be made monthly upon proper vouchers. If at any time there is more money in the fund provided for in this chapter than is necessary for the purposes of this chapter, then such surplus shall be transferred from such fund to the general fund of the city: PROVIDED, That at all times enough money shall be kept in said fund to meet all payments provided for in this chapter.

[ 1911 c 18 s 7; 1909 c 39 s 14; RRS s 9592.]